Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2922
Physical therapist assistant; certificate; qualifications.

Every applicant for a certificate to practice as a physical therapist assistant shall:

(1) Present proof of completion of an approved educational program; and

(2) Successfully complete an examination approved by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 140;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,384;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1015.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.